Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Agreement to Locate Property of Apparent Owner Held by Administrator

393A.760.
Right of agent of apparent owner to recover property held by administrator.

An apparent owner that contracts with another person to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the location, delivery, or recovery of property of the apparent owner which is held by the administrator may designate the person as the agent of the apparent owner. The designation shall be in a record signed by the apparent owner.

The administrator shall give the agent of the apparent owner all information concerning the property which the apparent owner is entitled to receive, including information that otherwise is confidential information under KRS

393A.780

.

If authorized by the apparent owner, the agent of the apparent owner may bring an action against the administrator on behalf of and in the name of the apparent owner.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 76, effective July 14, 2018.